Hawaii, session 2025, SB92.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by adding a new chapter to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Chapter CardiAC emergency response readiness §   -1  Definitions.  As used in this chapter: "Automated external defibrillator" or "AED" means a portable electronic device, approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration, that is capable of diagnosing cardiac arrythmias and uses defibrillation to reestablish an effective cardiac rhythm. "Cardiopulmonary resuscitation" or "CPR" means an emergency procedure to restore normal breathing after cardiac arrest that includes the clearance of air passages to the lungs, mouth-to-mouth method of artificial respiration, and heart massage by the exertion of pressure on the chest. "Department" means the department of accounting and general services. "State building" means any building or portion thereof that is owned or leased by the State and is occupied by state employees. For purposes of this chapter, "state building" includes all public schools as defined in section 302A-101. §   -2  Requirement to install and maintain automated external defibrillators in state buildings; cardiac emergency response plan; counties.  (a)  No later than January 1, 2026, the department shall install in every state building at least one AED placed on each floor, in a location accessible to employees of the state building and the public visiting the state building; provided that the AED shall be placed in accordance with nationally recognized emergency cardiovascular care guidelines. (b)  The department shall notify emergency services providers, as defined under section 78-52, of the existence, location, and type of each automated external defibrillator installed in a state building. (c) The department shall develop a cardiac emergency response plan that addresses the appropriate use of personnel to respond to incidents involving an individual experiencing sudden cardiac arrest or a similar life-threatening emergency in a state building.  The department shall work directly with the emergency service providers of each county to integrate the cardiac emergency response plan into the county's emergency service provider protocols. Each plan shall integrate evidence-based core elements, including those recommended by the American Heart Association or nationally recognized recommendations or core elements. (d)  This section shall not apply to state buildings where the lease agreement specifically prohibits AEDs. §   -3  Administering agency.  The department shall administer the provisions of this chapter and adopt rules, exempt from chapter 91, necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. §   -4  Training. (a)  The department shall provide CPR training and AED training for all of its employees and the employees and security staff of the: (1)  Office of the governor; (2)  Office of the lieutenant governor; (3)  State legislature; (4)  Department of education; (5)  Department of law enforcement; and (6)  Department of corrections and rehabilitation, in accordance with evidence-based guidelines adopted by the American Heart Association, the American National Red Cross, or a nationally recognized instructional program that is based on the most current national evidence-based emergency cardiovascular care guidelines for the administration of CPR or an AED. (b)  The department may contract for or procure as necessary the services of another public or private entity to assist with the training required under this section. (c)  Each state agency listed in subsection (a) shall provide to the department the names and electronic mail addresses of those state employees required to take the applicable training and shall assist the department by providing adequate meeting facilities, equipment, and technical support as needed for the training. §   -5  Maintenance.  The department shall conduct periodic inspections of all AEDS to ensure that they are maintained in an operative condition and are replaced or repaired when defective in accordance with: (1)  Nationally recognized emergency cardiovascular care guidelines; and (2)  The operation and maintenance guidelines established by the manufacturer. §   -6  Exception to liability.  Any person who: (1)  Administers an AED installed or maintained pursuant to this chapter; or (2)  Performs CPR pursuant to this chapter, shall be subject to section 663-1.5(e), and the protections provided thereunder." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the installation and maintenance of automated external defibrillators in state buildings pursuant to this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of accounting and general services for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the department of accounting and general services to provide trainings on the use of automated external defibrillators and performance of cardiopulmonary resuscitation for state employees and security staff for certain state agencies pursuant to this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of accounting and general services for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________